Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2065SV (2) 91 ll/js S.F. 507 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. a. A county or any county board 3 or office shall not adopt an ordinance, motion, resolution, 4 amendment, or policy, except as otherwise provided by federal 5 or state law, that does any of the following: 6 (1) Establishes or maintains a diversity, equity, and 7 inclusion office. 8 (2) Hires or assigns an employee or contracts with a third 9 party to perform duties of a diversity, equity, or inclusion 10 office. 11 (3) Compels, requires, induces, or solicits any person 12 to provide a diversity, equity, and inclusion statement, or 13 gives preferential consideration to any person based on the 14 provisions of a diversity, equity, and inclusion statement. 15 b. For purposes of this subsection: 16 (1) âDiversity, equity, and inclusionâ includes all of the 17 following: 18 (a) Any effort to manipulate or otherwise influence the 19 composition of a board of supervisors, any county board or 20 office, or county employee positions with reference to race, 21 sex, color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation, 22 apart from ensuring colorblind and sex-neutral hiring in 23 accordance with state and federal antidiscrimination laws. 24 (b) Any effort to promote differential treatment of or 25 provide special benefits to individuals on the basis of race, 26 color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation. 27 (c) Any effort to promote or promulgate policies and 28 procedures designed or implemented to encourage differential 29 treatment or provide special benefits to individuals on the 30 basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual 31 orientation. 32 (d) Any effort to promote or promulgate trainings, 33 programming, or activities designed or implemented to 34 encourage differential treatment or provide special benefits 35 -1- LSB 2065SV (2) 91 ll/js 1/ 6 S.F. 507 to individuals on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender 1 identity, or sexual orientation. This subparagraph division 2 shall not be construed to prohibit trainings, programming, or 3 activities consistent with section 80B.11G. 4 (e) Any effort to promote, as the official position 5 of the county, policies, programs, trainings, practices, 6 activities, or procedures referencing unconscious or implicit 7 bias, cultural appropriation, allyship, transgender ideology, 8 microaggressions, group marginalization, antiracism, systemic 9 oppression, social justice, intersectionality, neopronouns, 10 heteronormativity, disparate impact, gender theory, racial 11 privilege, sexual privilege, or any related formulation of 12 these concepts. 13 (2) âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ means any 14 division, office, center, or other unit of county government 15 that is responsible for creating, developing, designing, 16 implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies, 17 programming, training, practices, activities, or procedures 18 that meet the definition of âdiversity, equity, and inclusionâ . 19 âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ does not include 20 licensed attorneys and paralegal and secretarial support for 21 the licensed attorneys hired by the county to ensure legal 22 compliance with the countyâs obligations under the federal 23 Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Â§12101 et 24 seq., as amended, the federal Age Discrimination in Employment 25 Act of 1967, 29 U.S.C. Â§621 et seq., as amended, the federal 26 Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as amended, or 27 any other applicable federal or state law or a court order. 28 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. a. A city or any city board or office 31 shall not adopt an ordinance, motion, resolution, amendment, or 32 policy, except as otherwise provided by federal or state law, 33 that does any of the following: 34 (1) Establishes or maintains a diversity, equity, and 35 -2- LSB 2065SV (2) 91 ll/js 2/ 6 S.F. 507 inclusion office. 1 (2) Hires or assigns an employee or contracts with a third 2 party to perform duties of a diversity, equity, or inclusion 3 office. 4 (3) Compels, requires, induces, or solicits any person 5 to provide a diversity, equity, and inclusion statement, or 6 gives preferential consideration to any person based on the 7 provisions of a diversity, equity, and inclusion statement. 8 b. For purposes of this subsection: 9 (1) âDiversity, equity, and inclusionâ includes all of the 10 following: 11 (a) Any effort to manipulate or otherwise influence the 12 composition of a city council, any city board or office, or 13 city employee positions with reference to race, sex, color, 14 ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation, apart from 15 ensuring colorblind and sex-neutral hiring in accordance with 16 state and federal antidiscrimination laws. 17 (b) Any effort to promote differential treatment of or 18 provide special benefits to individuals on the basis of race, 19 color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation. 20 (c) Any effort to promote or promulgate policies and 21 procedures designed or implemented to encourage differential 22 treatment or provide special benefits to individuals on the 23 basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual 24 orientation. 25 (d) Any effort to promote or promulgate trainings, 26 programming, or activities designed or implemented to 27 encourage differential treatment or provide special benefits 28 to individuals on the basis of race, color, ethnicity, gender 29 identity, or sexual orientation. This subparagraph division 30 shall not be construed to prohibit trainings, programming, or 31 activities consistent with section 80B.11G. 32 (e) Any effort to promote, as the official position of the 33 city, policies, programs, trainings, practices, activities, 34 or procedures referencing unconscious or implicit bias, 35 -3- LSB 2065SV (2) 91 ll/js 3/ 6 S.F. 507 cultural appropriation, allyship, transgender ideology, 1 microaggressions, group marginalization, antiracism, systemic 2 oppression, social justice, intersectionality, neopronouns, 3 heteronormativity, disparate impact, gender theory, racial 4 privilege, sexual privilege, or any related formulation of 5 these concepts. 6 (2) âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ means any 7 division, office, center, or other unit of city government 8 that is responsible for creating, developing, designing, 9 implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies, 10 programming, training, practices, activities, or procedures 11 that meet the definition of âdiversity, equity, and inclusionâ . 12 âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ does not include 13 licensed attorneys and paralegal and secretarial support for 14 the licensed attorneys hired by the city to ensure legal 15 compliance with the cityâs obligations under the federal 16 Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Â§12101 et 17 seq., as amended, the federal Age Discrimination in Employment 18 Act of 1967, 29 U.S.C. Â§621 et seq., as amended, the federal 19 Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as amended, or 20 any other applicable federal or state law or a court order. 21